California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79282.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission, or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79283.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for obtaining injunctive relief or specific performance, relating to this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to,
 the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Section 526 or 527 is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding blueberries until there is full compliance with, and satisfaction of, the judgment.

(d) Upon a favorable judgment
 for the commission, the court may order that the commission be reimbursed for reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions is at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79284.

Any action by the commission for any penalty or other remedy that is prescribed under this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. Any action against the commission by any person shall be commenced within two years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79285.

The commission is not required to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist in any action brought under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79286.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any section, clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held unconstitutional or invalid as applied to any person or as applied under certain circumstances, that decision shall not affect the remaining portions of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any other persons or under any other circumstance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79287.

The termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [79291. - 79295.]

79291.

(a) Five years after implementation of this chapter, the secretary shall hold a public hearing, after providing proper notice to all persons subject to this chapter and any other persons or entities who have requested, in writing, notice of the hearing, to determine whether the operation of this chapter should be continued. If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among the persons assessed under this chapter regarding whether the operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall submit the chapter to a
 reapproval referendum to be conducted among producers and handlers to determine whether the operation of this chapter shall be reapproved and continued in effect.

(b) If the secretary finds after conducting a hearing that no substantial question exists or, if a reapproval referendum is required, that a majority of the eligible producers and a majority of eligible handlers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operation of this chapter, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the current marketing season. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 79294. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79292.

Following a hearing, and favorable referendum if required, the process specified in Section 79291 shall be conducted by the secretary every five years thereafter between October 1 and September 30, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to Section 79293. In that case, the hearing, and referendum if required, shall be conducted every five years following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 365, Sec. 9.   (AB 1795)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79293.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the commission be suspended. Any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season.

(b) The secretary shall, upon receipt of a recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with him or her requesting such suspension, signed by 15 percent of the producers by number who
 produced not less than 15 percent of the volume in the immediately preceding marketing season and 15 percent of the handlers by number who handled not less than 15 percent of the volume in the immediately preceding marketing season, cause a referendum to be conducted among the listed producers and handlers to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that this chapter has not effectuated its declared purposes.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. The secretary shall suspend the operation of this chapter, if the secretary finds the
 following:

(1) At least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(A) Sixty-five percent of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting produced a majority of the total quantity of blueberries produced in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(B) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting produced 65 percent or more of the total quantity of blueberries produced in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(2) At least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the secretary participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(A) Sixty-five percent of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of blueberries handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(B) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the total quantity of blueberries handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79294.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter and of the commission, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and all moneys held by the commission, and moneys collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding current marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro
 rata refund to those persons, any moneys remaining and any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate state or federal program or used to fund activities related to the subject matter of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79295.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers and handlers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Quality Standards [79301. - 79304.]

79301.

The commission may recommend to the secretary that he or she adopt blueberry quality standards, product labeling, or engage in any other activity authorized pursuant to the California Marketing Act of 1937 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58601) of Part 2 of Division 21). The adoption of standards or any of these activities shall be in accordance with the procedures specified in that act unless otherwise specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79302.

Any activity recommended by the commission shall not become operative until approved in the manner specified in Section 79262.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79303.

Any activity adopted pursuant to this article shall be implemented by the secretary at the beginning of the marketing season next succeeding the date on which the activity is approved by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79304.

The commission shall serve as the advisory body to the secretary on all matters pertaining to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 27. California Nursery Producers Commission [79401. - 79525.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [79401. - 79414.]

79401.

The production of nursery products constitutes an important industry of this state that provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state, products that are a foundation for its residents’ food supply, and employment for its residents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79402.

The maintenance of the nursery industry of California is necessary to assure the public and the state’s and nation’s crop agriculture industry of a continuous supply of vital nursery products and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the nursery industry and in its supplier, distribution, and related service chain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79403.

The production of nursery products in California is currently the state’s number two agricultural crop with 2008 farm gate sales of four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000) and has the potential to become the leading segment of the state’s agricultural industry. To realize this potential, there is a need to engage in research beneficial to the industry, to educate the public relative to nursery products, and to promote and market nursery products. The activities made possible by the establishment of the commission will meet these needs and further the interests of the industry and the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79404.

The nursery industry has been negatively impacted by invasive pests and diseases that also adversely affect the state’s environment, urban quality, and agricultural production. The activities authorized by this commission will improve the quality of nursery products and limit these negative impacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79405.

The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient development and management of a research, public education, and marketing program that will enhance the reputation of the California nursery industry, create a more receptive environment for the industry and its products, aid its growth at both wholesale and retail, and increase competitiveness of the California nursery industry within the national and international marketplace. In addition, the commission is necessary to carry out the California nursery industry’s commitment to responsible stewardship, environmental protection, and increasingly efficient cultural practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79406.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the commission is intended to operate in conjunction with other nursery-related laws and programs in the state, including, but not limited to, the licensing laws and regulations applicable to nurseries (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6701) of Part 3 of Division 4), the inspection and cleanliness laws applicable to nurseries (Article 1 (commencing with Section 6901) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 4), the shipment and pest certification laws applicable to nurseries (Article 2 (commencing with Section 6921) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 6961) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 4), the grades and standards laws and regulations applicable to nurseries (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 53301) of Division
 18), and specific nursery stock programs such as the California Grape Rootstock Improvement Commission (Chapter 12.6 (commencing with Section 74701)).

(b) The legislature finds and declares that the commission enhances the existing comprehensive statutory and regulatory structure affecting all aspects of nursery products production in California.

(c) The commission shall periodically meet and confer with all other nursery-related programs administered by the department to ensure coordination of policies and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79407.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the programs specified in Section 79406, including this commission, greatly benefit the nursery industry, and as such, advance the interests of the State of California by providing substantial employment for the state’s citizens, producing needed tax and fee revenues for the support of state and local government, encouraging responsible stewardship of valuable agricultural resources and the environment, and producing substantial quantities of nursery products for the state, nation, and world.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79408.

The successes that the nursery industry of California has achieved have resulted from a commitment to industry-funded research that has led to significant improvements in the quality and quantity of the nursery products available to consumers and increasingly more efficient and environmentally protective cultural practices. The establishment of the commission will continue and enhance this research effort and move the nursery industry toward its potential, resulting in increased consumer value and enhanced grower returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79409.

The production of nursery products in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purposes of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79410.

Opportunity exists for continued growth and expansion of the nursery industry by creating new markets. The success of such an expansion program is uniquely dependent upon effective research and public education, since the creation of new markets is essentially a matter of educating and informing people of the use, value, and availability of nursery products and enhancing the reputation of the California nursery products industry. The expansion of the nursery industry also provides an important and expanding source of jobs for many people in this state, including many residing in historically depressed areas of the state, and it serves to ensure the preservation of an agrarian society. The expansion also provides pathways for the unemployed, the poor, unskilled laborers, rehabilitated
 inmates, and other disadvantaged groups to learn valuable professional nursery skills and obtain seasonal or permanent employment with career potential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79411.

The commission’s activities are necessary for the efficient development of a national and international program and exists as an integral part of a broader framework of state and federal statutes and regulations designed to: collectively enhance the quality and reputation of California nursery products; create a more receptive environment for nursery products; improve the capability of nursery products producers to function within the overall regulatory environment; increase the competitiveness of the nursery products industry within the national and international marketplace; implement the industry’s commitment to responsible stewardship of agricultural land and the environment and increasingly efficient cultural practices; and further the goals and interests of the state by
 preserving the economic well-being of the agricultural economy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79412.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the production of nursery products the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad fields of research, education, and the development, maintenance, and expansion of markets.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79413.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade. The Legislature intends this program to be among those contemplated by the United States Congress in the enactment of Section 610(i) of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79414.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that commission members and alternates are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve a public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [79421. - 79433.]

79421.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79422.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79423.

“Commission” means the California Nursery Producers Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79424.

“Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79424.5.

(a) “Districts” consists of the following:

(1) District 1, which includes the Counties of Imperial, Orange, and San Diego.

(2) District 2, which includes the Counties of Inyo, Kern, Kings, Los Angeles, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Tulare, and Ventura.

(3) District 3, which includes the Counties of Alameda, Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Contra Costa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Fresno, Glenn, Humboldt, Lake, Lassen, Madera, Marin, Mariposa, Mendocino, Merced, Modoc, Mono, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Sacramento, San Benito, San Francisco, San Joaquin, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the members of the commission, which is concurred in by the secretary, when necessary to maintain similar total production among the districts and to ensure proper representation. These boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79425.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79426.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell nursery products to a person other than another producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79427.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” are synonymous terms and mean the period beginning May 1 of any year and extending through April 30 of the following year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79428.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or partnership, firm, company, or other entity doing business in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79429.

“Producer” means any person that operates under a California state nursery license (producer category), and that produces, or causes to be produced, nursery products for the purposes of transferring title to another person. “Producer” does not include a licensed producer nursery that produced and sold nursery products for a gross dollar value of less than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in the preceding marketing season.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79430.

“Nursery products” means any plant for planting, propagation, or ornamentation, but does not include flowers as defined in Section 77911 or grape rootstock as defined in Section 74718.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79431.

“Research” means any research relating to invasive pests, the production, harvest, postharvest handling, or marketing of nursery products, nursery product components, or practices employed by nurseries, and research relating to public education regarding nurseries and nursery products, including, but not limited to, basic and applied research.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79432.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79433.

“Sell” or “sold” means to transfer or cause the transfer of title to nursery products for valuable consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Nursery Producers Commission  [79441. - 79456.]

79441.

(a) There is in the state government the California Nursery Producers Commission. The commission shall be composed of 14 producers nominated and elected by and from producers, and one public member.

(b) Eligible persons from within the respective districts shall elect four producers from District 1, four producers from District 2, and four producers from District 3. All eligible persons shall elect two members at large.

(c) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(d) The secretary and other appropriate individuals, as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79442.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make the corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in
 violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, his or her reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79443.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall give his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The secretary shall set forth in writing with specificity the reasons for any refusal to concur. The secretary’s response may be a requirement that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79444.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79445.

Except for ex officio members, an alternate for each member shall be nominated and elected, and for the public member appointed, in the same manner as the member. An alternate shall, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member and shall have, and be able to exercise, all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of a change in status making a member ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate shall act as a member of the commission for the unexpired portion of the term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79446.

Except as provided in Section 79441, any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to or serving on the commission as an alternate to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled by another eligible person for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of the members of the commission. The person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the person whose office he or she is to occupy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79447.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of the public member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification, may be filled upon appointment by the secretary, from nominees recommended by the commission, of another eligible person for the unexpired portion of the term. The person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to occupy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79448.

Any producer member and his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual producer or an employee or representative of a producer that has a financial interest in producing nursery products or causing nursery products to be produced. The qualifications of producer members and their alternates shall be maintained during their entire term of office. The absence of any producer member from two consecutive meetings or lapse in qualifications shall be grounds for the commission to declare the seat vacant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79449.

The public member and his or her alternate shall not have any financial interest in the nursery industry. The public member and his or her alternate shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate, respectively, on the commission, except that the public member and his or her alternate member shall not have a vote on issues regarding the assessments established pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 79501).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79450.

Commission members and alternates shall serve three-year terms and until their successors are elected, and qualified, except, that of the first members of the commission, one-third shall serve one year, one-third shall serve two years, and one-third shall serve three years. The determination of the term of each member shall be made by lot. The public member and his or her alternate shall serve three-year terms and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79451.

The commission may sue and be sued regarding any matter related to the purposes of this chapter and contract and be contracted with.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79452.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum of the commission for the transaction of business. The vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum constitutes the act of the commission. The commission may continue to transact business at a meeting at which a quorum is initially present, notwithstanding the withdrawal of members, provided any action is approved by the requisite majority of the required quorum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79453.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meetings of the commission. However, the secretary or his or her representative is not entitled to attend an executive session of the commission or a committee of the commission called for the purpose of discussing potential or actual litigation against the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79454.

No member or alternate of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission and each alternate serving in place of a member, except ex officio members who are officers or employees of a public agency, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive reasonable and necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances as approved by the commission for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79455.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied under this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks that the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79456.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable for the contracts or other liabilities of the commission. No member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually in any way to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible
 individually for any act or omission of any other member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof. No member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is liable for the default of any other member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof.
